Washington statutes.
RCW 41.06.196

Employee performance evaluations—Termination of supervisors tolerating inadequate employee performance.

The director shall adopt rules designed to remove from supervisory positions those supervisors who in violation of the rules adopted under RCW 41.06.186 have tolerated the continued employment of employees under their supervision whose performance has warranted termination from state employment.

[ 2002 c 354 s 216; 1993 c 281 s 33; 1985 c 461 s 6.]

NOTES:

Short title—Headings, captions not law—Severability—Effective dates—2002 c 354: See RCW 41.80.907 through 41.80.910.

Effective date—1993 c 281: See note following RCW 41.06.022.

Severability—1985 c 461: See note following RCW 41.06.020.

Duty of state officers to identify employees whose performance warrants termination from state employment: RCW 43.01.125.